Georgia statutes. 
36-7-13. Persons who may perform duties of office when there is no county surveyor; oath; liability.

36-7-14. Appointment of disinterested surveyor; oath.

36-7-15. Removal of surveyor from office.

36-7-16. Penalty for making false survey.

Annotations

Cross references. - Determination of land boundaries generally, T. 44, C. 4.

36-7-1. Requirement of county surveyor for each county; appointment of assistants or deputies.

Statute text

There must be one county surveyor for each county. The surveyor is empowered to appoint one or more assistants or deputies, for whose conduct he is responsible.

History

(Laws 1783, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 665; Laws 1784, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 670; Code 1863, § 548; Code 1868, § 612; Code 1873, § 571; Code 1882, § 571; Civil Code 1895, § 478; Civil Code 1910, § 596; Code 1933, § 23-1105.)

36-7-2. Election, commissioning, qualification, and removal of county surveyor; qualifications.

Statute text

(a) County surveyors shall be elected, commissioned, qualified, and removed as are clerks of the superior courts and shall hold their offices for four years.

(b) (1) Every person holding the post of county surveyor must be a qualified surveyor, licensed by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, and such person must have successfully passed the examination given by the board as a prerequisite to the granting of a license as a land surveyor; provided, however, that any person holding the position of county surveyor on March 7, 1966, whether elected or appointed, shall not be required to meet the qualifications enumerated in this subsection so long as such person remains in the position of county surveyor, whether reappointed or reelected to this position.

(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to:

(A) Any county having a population of less than 17,000 inhabitants according to the United States decennial census of 1960 or any future such census; or

(B) Any person who was holding the position of county surveyor in such a county on January 1, 1977, and who has acted continuously as county surveyor since that date, for as long as such person remains in the position of county surveyor, notwithstanding the fact that the population of the county has grown to exceed 17,000.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section or paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-15-29, a county surveyor who is not licensed by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors shall only practice land surveying for the county and shall not engage in the private practice of professional land surveying; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to any county surveyor duly elected and holding office on June 30, 1986, so long as said person continues to hold the office of county surveyor; provided, however, that any county surveyor who has a minimum of four years of surveying experience shall be eligible to take the land surveyor examination and eligible for certification as a land surveyor.

History

(Laws 1799, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 198; Code 1863, § 543; Code 1868, § 607; Code 1873, § 566; Code 1882, § 566; Civil Code 1895, § 473; Civil Code 1910, § 591; Code 1933, § 23-1101; Ga. L. 1966, p. 225, §§ 1, 4, 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 888, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 555, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Election, qualifications, duties, powers, and compensation of county officers, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III.

Removal of clerks of superior courts, § 15-6-82.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Philpot v. Wells, 69 Ga. App. 489, 26 S.E.2d 155 (1943).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Surveyor not subject to city business license. - County surveyor who makes surveys, other than those made by an order of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) or court, is not subject to a city business license. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 371.

Applicability to one serving at time of enactment. - Any person who held the position of county surveyor on March 7, 1966 (the date this section was approved) could serve as county surveyor regardless of whether the person was licensed as a surveyor by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors so long as the person's service in that office was continuous. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-509.

Construed with § 36-7-9 and O.C.G.A. § 43-15-7. - County surveyor who is not registered by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors may not, under any authority, engage in the private practice of land surveying outside of the county in which the surveyor was elected; nor may the surveyor engage in the private practice of land surveying in the county of election unless the surveyor was duly elected and holding office on June 30, 1986, and has continued, uninterrupted, to hold such office. 1990 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 90-13.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 164 et seq. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 46.

36-7-2.1. Abolishing elected office and authorizing appointment; qualifications of appointed surveyor.

Statute text

(a) The General Assembly may by local law abolish the office of elected county surveyor in any county of this state and authorize the governing authority of the county to appoint the county surveyor for such term of office as the General Assembly shall provide by said local law.

(b) A local law abolishing the office of elected county surveyor pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall comply with the provisions of Code Section 1-3-11 requiring referendum approval on abolishing certain offices, except that if the office of the elected county surveyor is vacant at the time of its abolishment or if the person holding the office was appointed to fill a vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 36-7-3, such office may be abolished at any time without the necessity of a referendum.

(c) A county surveyor appointed by a county governing authority pursuant to the authority of a local Act enacted pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall possess the qualifications to hold office as a county surveyor specified by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-7-2 and shall carry out the duties of a county surveyor as provided in this chapter and other laws of this state.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-7-2.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 919, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-7-3. Procedure when election fails to fill office; procedure in event of vacancy.

Statute text

(a) Whenever an election fails to fill the office of county surveyor, the judge of the probate court shall appoint a person to serve as the county surveyor until a successor is duly elected in a special election which shall be held at the time of the next general election to serve out the remainder of the unexpired term of office.

(b) In the event that a vacancy occurs in the office of county surveyor, the judge of the probate court shall appoint a person to serve for the unexpired term of office and until his successor is duly elected and has qualified.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 544; Code 1868, § 608; Code 1873, § 567; Code 1882, § 567; Civil Code 1895, § 474; Civil Code 1910, § 592; Code 1933, § 23-1102; Ga. L. 1969, p. 350, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 586, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1988, p. 586, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 1988 amendment of this Code section applied to any vacancy occurring on or after March 30, 1988.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Williams v. Richmond County, 241 Ga. 89, 243 S.E.2d 55 (1978).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of judge of the probate court. - Former Code 1933, §§ 21-101 and 21-102 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 45-16-1 and 45-16-2), when read in light of former Code 1933, § 23-1102 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-7-3), designated the judge of the probate court as the proper authority to fill vacancies occurring in the county office of coroner absent special laws directing that this function be fulfilled by some other authority. 1978 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 78-58.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 163 et seq. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 47, 161 et seq.

36-7-4. Commissioning of surveyor.

Statute text

A county surveyor who derives his authority from appointment needs no commission beyond the order of the judge of the probate court entered on his minutes, of which appointment the Governor must be informed without delay.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 545; Code 1868, § 609; Code 1873, § 568; Code 1882, § 568; Civil Code 1895, § 475; Civil Code 1910, § 593; Code 1933, § 23-1103.)

36-7-5. Oath of office; bond and security.

Statute text

In addition to the oath required of all public officers, the county surveyor must take the following oath before entering on the duties of his office:

"I, ________, swear that I will, to the best of my skill and knowledge, discharge the duties of surveyor of ________ County and that I will not admeasure, survey, or lay out any land, in my capacity as such, or knowingly permit or cause it to be done, without a warrant first obtained for that purpose. So help me God."

At the same time, he shall give bond and security in the sum of $1,000.00.

History

(Laws 1847, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 217; Code 1863, § 546; Code 1868, § 610; Code 1873, § 569; Code 1882, § 569; Civil Code 1895, § 476; Civil Code 1910, § 594; Code 1933, § 23-1104.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Oaths required of public officers, T. 45, C. 3.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 124, 130 et seq., 345 et seq., 354, 358, 488, 489.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 159, 160. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 70 et seq.

36-7-6. Oath of assistant; entry of appointment of assistant on minutes of probate court.

Statute text

When an assistant is appointed by the county surveyor, he must take the same oath the county surveyor takes. The fact of his appointment must, at the same time, be entered on the minutes of the judge of the probate court.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 549; Code 1868, § 613; Code 1873, § 572; Code 1882, § 572; Civil Code 1895, § 479; Civil Code 1910, § 597; Code 1933, § 23-1106.)

36-7-7. Place of office.

Statute text

The county surveyor may keep his office at his place of abode, if within the limits of the county. The county shall not be required to furnish the county surveyor with an office or facilities.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 550; Code 1868, § 614; Code 1873, § 573; Code 1882, § 573; Civil Code 1895, § 480; Civil Code 1910, § 598; Code 1933, § 23-1107; Ga. L. 1966, p. 225, § 2.)

36-7-8. Duties of surveyor generally.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the county surveyor:

(1) To observe punctually and carry into effect all such orders as he may receive from any officer who may lawfully command him;

(2) To partition lands, to make resurveys, to give plats of all surveys, and to administer all oaths required by law in such cases;

(3) To survey county lines and district lines and to make other surveys in which his county may be interested whenever required to do so by the county governing authority;

(4) To execute all surveys required by the rule or order of any court of competent jurisdiction; and

(5) To keep a well-bound book in which shall be entered plats of all surveys made by him with a minute of the names of the chainbearers, when executed, by whose order, and to whom the plat was delivered, if any. Such book shall belong to his office and shall be turned over to his successor; when full, it shall be deposited in the office of the county governing authority.

History

(Laws 1783, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 668; Laws 1785, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 672; Laws 1838, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 215; Code 1863, § 551; Code 1868, § 615; Code 1873, § 574; Code 1882, § 574; Civil Code 1895, § 481; Civil Code 1910, § 599; Code 1933, § 23-1108; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Duties of county surveyor relating to surveys for homestead purposes, §§ 44-13-5, 44-13-6, 44-13-11, 44-13-12, 44-13-102, 44-13-103.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 12 Am. Jur. 2d, Boundaries, § 46 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 207.

ALR. - Partition: division of building, 28 A.L.R. 727.

36-7-9. Establishment of fees.

Statute text

(a) The county surveyor shall be allowed to establish a reasonable fee for each of the following acts:

(1) Surveying a town lot and returning a certificate thereof;

(2) Surveying a tract of land;

(3) Making a plat and recording, advertising, and transmitting the same to the Secretary of State's office;

(4) Making a resurvey of land by order of court;

(5) For every other survey, making and certifying a plat thereof and transmitting the same;

(6) Running lines between counties or districts or making new lines, per day, the county surveyor furnishing the chainbearer and provisions;

(7) Making a plat of homestead, affidavit, and return;

(8) Making each additional plat where there is more than one lot; and

(9) Making any other survey he may be called upon or required to perform.

The fee established by the county surveyor shall be reasonably equivalent to the same fee which would be charged if the survey had been conducted by a private surveyor.

(b) The county surveyor shall be allowed to contract for his services in the same manner as private surveyors, whenever he is called upon or required to make a survey for a private or a corporate benefit or by order of the county governing authority or by order of the court.

History

(Laws 1792, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 350; Code 1863, § 3626; Code 1868, § 3651; Ga. L. 1870, p. 68, § 1; Code 1873, § 3702; Code 1882, § 3702; Civil Code 1895, § 490; Civil Code 1910, § 608; Code 1933, § 23-1109; Ga. L. 1966, p. 225, §§ 3, 5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1413, § 1.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Construction. - County surveyor who is not registered by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors may not, under any authority, engage in the private practice of land surveying outside of the county in which the surveyor was elected; nor may the surveyor engage in the private practice of land surveying in the surveyor's county of election unless the surveyor was duly elected and holding office on June 30, 1986, and has continued, uninterrupted, to hold such office. 1990 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 90-13.

No conflict with other sections. - There does not appear to be any conflict between former Code 1933, §§ 23-1109 and 85-1610 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-7-9 and 44-4-10), but even if there were one, former Code 1933, § 23-1109 being based upon a more recent statute, would apparently govern. 1971 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-45.

36-7-10. Payment of fees generally.

Statute text

The fees for surveys made by the county surveyor for private or corporate benefit shall be paid by the person or corporation ordering the survey. The fees for surveys made by order of the county governing authority shall be paid out of county funds. The fees for surveys made by order of court, unless otherwise agreed upon, are to be taxed in the bill of costs and shall have the effect of a judgment lien upon the land surveyed, if not paid by the party bound for costs.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 552; Code 1868, § 616; Code 1873, § 575; Code 1882, § 575; Civil Code 1895, § 482; Civil Code 1910, § 600; Code 1933, § 23-1110.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cost of survey. - When the plaintiffs sought an injunction restraining the defendant from closing a roadway running across the defendant's property to the plaintiff's property, the court did not err in taxing against the plaintiffs as a part of the costs, $128.00 incurred in making a survey ordered by the court. In an equity case, the court has the right to place the costs upon either of the parties, and this section definitely makes the cost of survey a part of the court costs. Nelson v. Girard, 215 Ga. 518, 111 S.E.2d 60 (1959).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Surveyor not subject to city business license. - County surveyor who makes surveys, other than those made by an order of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) or court, is not subject to a city business license. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 371.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 20 Am. Jur. 2d, Costs, §§ 69, 76.

36-7-11. Issuance of execution for fees.

Statute text

A county surveyor who makes a survey for a person who neglects to pay him may make oath before the judge of the probate court of his county of the performance of such service and its value. The judge of the probate court shall thereupon issue a fi. fa. in his name for the use of the surveyor, against the person defaulting. Such person may defend himself therefor in the same manner as persons against whom executions issue for detaining county funds.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 554; Code 1868, § 618; Code 1873, § 577; Code 1882, § 577; Civil Code 1895, § 483; Civil Code 1910, § 608; Code 1933, § 23-1111.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Filing of affidavit of illegality by person against whom execution has been issued for holding county money, § 48-5-239.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Section provides remedy for collection of fee. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1111 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-7-11), taken in connection with former Code 1933, § 91A-1219 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-239), provided a remedy for a county surveyor to collect the surveyor's fees for official services rendered, and also a way for the defendant to test the correctness of the claim. Webb v. Stephens, 57 Ga. App. 395, 195 S.E. 577 (1938).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Judge must issue execution. - This section is clear and unambiguous and makes it the duty of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to issue a fi. fa. when the surveyor has complied with the provisions of this section. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 87.

36-7-12. Surveys or plats deemed presumptive evidence of facts.

Statute text

Surveys or plats of lands within his county, made by the county surveyor under order of court and on notice to all the parties, signed by him officially, and stating the contents, courses, and distances of any land surveyed by him are presumptive evidence of the facts if all the requisites of the law touching such surveys and the reports thereof are complied with.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 555; Code 1868, § 619; Code 1873, § 578; Code 1882, § 578; Civil Code 1895, § 484; Civil Code 1910, § 602; Code 1933, § 23-1112.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Admissibility of official survey. - Surveys or plats made pursuant to the requirements of this section are presumptive evidence of the facts set out therein. McClung v. Schulte, 214 Ga. 426, 105 S.E.2d 225 (1958).

Survey made by others than county surveyor is not admissible in evidence, unless proved by parties who made the survey; the affidavit of such persons on the survey is not sufficient proof, and such affidavit, the persons making the survey not being sworn as witnesses in the pending trial, cannot be received as evidence of anything on that trial. Maples v. Hoggard, 58 Ga. 315 (1877).

Admissibility of unofficial survey. - Plat that did not show that the plat was purported to have been made by authority since the plat was shown to have been made before the city charter was ever issued did not meet the requirements of law of either former Code 1933, § 23-1112 or former Code 1933, § 38-312 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-7-12 or former O.C.G.A. § 24-3-11 [see now O.C.G.A. § 24-8-803]), and could not be used in evidence without other testimony or evidence. Central of Ga. Ry. v. City of Metter, 222 Ga. 74, 148 S.E.2d 661 (1966).

In an ejectment action, a plat introduced by the party bringing the action is not presumptive evidence of the facts set out in the plat, when there is no evidence that the plat is an official survey under this section. Costello v. Styles, 227 Ga. 650, 182 S.E.2d 427 (1971).

Unofficial surveys are admissible when proved to be correct. McClung v. Schulte, 214 Ga. 426, 105 S.E.2d 225 (1958).

Unofficial survey is admissible in evidence when proved to have been corrected by the parties who made the survey. Lewis v. Carr, 177 Ga. 761, 171 S.E. 298 (1933).

Plat or survey is not admissible as substantive, presumptive evidence of facts set forth therein, unless it conforms to provisions of this section, but upon being verified by oral testimony as correct, the plat or survey may be admitted for the purpose of illustrating other competent testimony. Woodard v. Bowen, 213 Ga. 185, 97 S.E.2d 573 (1957).

County tax plats admissible. - In an action to quiet title to real property, county tax plats used as evidence of the ownership of the depicted property were admissible. Resseau v. Bland, 268 Ga. 634, 491 S.E.2d 809 (1997).

Survey not made under order of court so as to make plat admissible under this section is admissible as an official document for whatever it may have been worth as a pictorial representation of conditions found on the ground by the surveyor. Gilman Paper Co. v. James, 235 Ga. 348, 219 S.E.2d 447 (1975).

Unofficial survey does not meet the statutory requirements of this section. However, an unofficial but properly verified survey is admissible for whatever weight the jury attaches to the survey. Johnson v. Jones, 242 Ga. 319, 249 S.E.2d 30 (1978).

Effect of oral testimony. - Unless a survey of plat is of official origin and meets the requirements of this section, it carries no presumptive value as evidence of the facts, although, if verified by oral testimony, it is admissible as a part of and as illustrative of such oral testimony for whatever that testimony may be worth. R.G. Foster & Co. v. Fountain, 216 Ga. 113, 114 S.E.2d 863 (1960).

Plat prepared by the county surveyor, which the surveyor identified as one prepared at the request of parties to the litigation, but not one which is shown to conform to the requirements of this section is admissible in evidence as a part of and illustrative of the oral testimony of the surveyor. Fendley v. Weaver, 121 Ga. App. 526, 174 S.E.2d 369 (1970).

Witness as to correctness of survey. - In principle it would seem to be immaterial whether the witness who proposes to testify to the correctness of an unofficial survey be the surveyor, or one who was present at the time the survey was made, if the witness offers to testify to the correctness of the survey. Lewis v. Carr, 177 Ga. 761, 171 S.E. 298 (1933).

Cited in Arnold v. Shackelford, 219 Ga. 839, 136 S.E.2d 384 (1964); Minor v. Ray, 122 Ga. App. 531, 177 S.E.2d 842 (1970); Fountain v. Bryan, 229 Ga. 120, 189 S.E.2d 400 (1972); Sutton v. City of Cordele, 230 Ga. 681, 198 S.E.2d 856 (1973); Clark v. Stafford, 239 Ga. App. 69, 522 S.E.2d 6 (1999); Ware v. Rutledge, 240 Ga. App. 355, 523 S.E.2d 411 (1999).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 12 Am. Jur. 2d, Boundaries, § 95 et seq.

36-7-13. Persons who may perform duties of office when there is no county surveyor; oath; liability.

Statute text

(a) When there is no county surveyor, any person who is a citizen of this state and who holds a current and valid certificate of registration as a land surveyor issued by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors may perform the duties of county surveyor, when specifically required or appointed to do so, if first sworn to do the same faithfully and impartially, to the best of his skill and knowledge.

(b) Persons performing such service are on the same footing as county surveyors as to the special service rendered and are personally liable as such surveyors are officially liable.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 556, 557; Code 1868, §§ 620, 621; Code 1873, §§ 579, 580; Code 1882, §§ 579, 580; Civil Code 1895, §§ 485, 486; Civil Code 1910, §§ 603, 604; Code 1933, §§ 23-1113, 23-1114; Ga. L. 1973, p. 636, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Certification of land surveyors by State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, T. 43, C. 15.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Section mandatory upon processioners. - Upon application to processioners to mark anew a dividing line, the surveyor, where there is no county surveyor, must be chosen and qualified as provided by statute. Watkins v. Sailers, 65 Ga. App. 77, 15 S.E.2d 306 (1941).

Oath mandatory. - When a private surveyor is selected and performs the duties required of a county surveyor without first having taken the oath required under this section, the return of the processioners is void. Watkins v. Sailers, 65 Ga. App. 77, 15 S.E.2d 306 (1941).

Cited in Irby v. Raley, 88 Ga. App. 807, 78 S.E.2d 72 (1953).

36-7-14. Appointment of disinterested surveyor; oath.

Statute text

When any county surveyor is interested in any survey to be made, the judge of the superior court or the judge of the probate court of the county in which the land is located, upon the application of any party in interest, shall appoint a competent, disinterested surveyor or, in his discretion, may appoint the surveyor of any adjoining county to make the survey. If the surveyor appointed is not a county surveyor, before entering on the survey, he shall subscribe before some judicial officer of the county the oath required of county surveyors. The rights, powers, and duties of the surveyor so appointed shall be the same as those of the county surveyor. The return of the surveyor shall have the same force and effect as do other surveys.

History

(Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 104, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 487, 488; Civil Code 1910, §§ 605, 606; Code 1933, §§ 23-1115, 23-1116.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Irby v. Raley, 88 Ga. App. 807, 78 S.E.2d 72 (1953); Poss v. Guy, 212 Ga. 393, 93 S.E.2d 565 (1956).

36-7-15. Removal of surveyor from office.

Statute text

The county surveyor, whether elected or appointed, may be removed by the judge of the probate court for want of capacity, in the same fashion as clerks of the superior courts are removed in the superior court. This cause of removal shall be in addition to the causes which apply to all public officers.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 547; Code 1868, § 611; Code 1873, § 570; Code 1882, § 570; Civil Code 1895, § 477; Civil Code 1910, § 595; Code 1933, § 23-1117.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Removal of clerks of superior courts, § 15-6-82.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 170, 171, 177 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 168 et seq.

36-7-16. Penalty for making false survey.

Statute text

Any county surveyor or other person acting as such who knowingly surveys nonvacant land as vacant land or makes any other false survey shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 558; Code 1868, § 622; Code 1873, § 581; Code 1882, § 581; Civil Code 1895, § 489; Penal Code 1895, § 278; Civil Code 1910, § 607; Penal Code 1910, § 282; Code 1933, § 23-9903.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 198, 199.

——————————

CHAPTER 8

COUNTY POLICE

Sec.

36-8-1. Election or appointment of county police; qualifications.

36-8-2. Terms of office; removal; authority to abolish county police force.

36-8-3. Bonds and actions thereon.

36-8-4. Establishment of salaries; payment; tax levy.

36-8-5. Powers of county police generally.

36-8-6. Inspection of and reports on roads and bridges [Repealed].

36-8-7. Rules and regulations for conduct, management, and control of county police.

Annotations

Cross references. - Police power of counties, generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. III(a)(1).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

No change in general law. - Nothing in this chapter (especially Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 6 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-8-3)) which authorizes the appointment of county police officers, insofar as the statute may undertake to fix the liability of the sureties upon a county officer's bond, changes the general law as contained in former Civil Code 1910, § 291 (see now O.C.G.A. § 45-4-24). Hodge v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 42 Ga. App. 84, 155 S.E. 95 (1930).

Cited in Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948); Barge v. Camp, 209 Ga. 38, 70 S.E.2d 360 (1952); Thompson v. Hornsby, 235 Ga. 561, 221 S.E.2d 192 (1975).

36-8-1. Election or appointment of county police; qualifications.

Statute text

(a) The county governing authority shall have authority to elect or appoint such number of county police as in its discretion it deems proper, provided that the county governing authority complies with the provisions of this Code section. Any person elected or appointed to the county police shall possess the qualifications prescribed in Code Section 35-8-8.

(b) (1) Each county governing authority may authorize, through proper resolution or ordinance, the creation of a county police force. No resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall become effective until the governing authority of the county has submitted to the qualified electors of the county the question of whether the resolution or ordinance shall be approved or rejected. The county governing authority shall establish the date of the election in compliance with Code Section 21-2-540, which shall be not less than 30 days after the call of the election, and shall notify the county election superintendent of its decision as to the date. The election superintendent shall issue the call for the election and shall specify that the election shall be held on the date determined by the county governing authority. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of the county. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the following:

"( ) YES Shall the resolution or ordinance adopted by the governing authority of (Name of County) to create a

( ) NO county police force be approved?"

(2) Those persons desiring to vote in favor of the creation of a county police force shall vote "Yes," and those persons opposed to the creation of a county police force shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are in favor of the creation of a county police force, then the county governing authority shall be authorized to create a county police force pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; otherwise, a county police force shall not be created. If the resolution or ordinance is rejected by the qualified electors, the question of the creation of a county police force may not again be submitted to the voters of the county within 48 months immediately following the month in which such election was held. The county election superintendent shall hold and conduct the election under the same rules and regulations as govern special elections, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. He shall canvass the returns and declare and certify the result of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense of any such election shall be borne by the county wherein the election was held.

(c) The provisions of subsection (b) shall not apply to any county which has created a county police force prior to January 1, 1992, which county police force remains in existence and operational.

(d) Any county police force created by a county governing authority between January 1, 1992, and February 25, 1992, shall be abolished no later than December 31, 1992, unless, prior to said latter date, a resolution or ordinance authorizing the creation of a county police force is adopted by the county governing authority and approved by the qualified electors of the county in a special election as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 849; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-1401; Ga. L. 1992, p. 324, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "February 25, 1992," was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in subsection (d).

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Applicability. - This chapter applies to all counties of the state. Eison v. Shirley, 165 Ga. 374, 141 S.E. 295 (1927).

Effect on powers of sheriff. - Even when a county police force is established, the power and authority of the sheriff to enforce the law and preserve the peace are not legally diminished. Wolfe v. Huff, 232 Ga. 44, 205 S.E.2d 254 (1974).

Power to direct owner from burning building. - Under the police power, a deputy sheriff is authorized to go upon private property and direct the owner to move back from a burning building, when the deputy has been made aware of the possibility of an explosion, and in the deputy's opinion the safety of a 21/2-year-old child was unnecessarily endangered because of the proximity to the burning structure. Veit v. State, 182 Ga. App. 753, 357 S.E.2d 113 (1987).

County marshals acting as police force. - O.C.G.A. § 36-8-1(b)(1) referendum requirement was inapplicable to a county which created a county police force before January 1, 1992, which remained in existence and operational; however, in the context of a suit seeking injunctive and declaratory relief regarding whether the Fayette County, Georgia, Marshal's Department was a valid police force, fact issues remained, and summary judgment was improper, when affidavits claimed that county marshals did not operate as a county police force during the relevant time period. Johnson v. Fayette County, 280 Ga. 493, 635 S.E.2d 35 (2006).

Cited in Cloud v. DeKalb County, 70 Ga. App. 777, 29 S.E.2d 441 (1944); Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Power not delegable to grand jury. - County commissioners may use a grand jury to advise the commissioners on selection of police, but the commissioners may not delegate their authority to appoint police to a grand jury. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 79.

Qualifications of sheriff as police officer. - When a county police department is established and the law enforcement functions of the sheriff are transferred to such department, the sheriff or the sheriff's deputies may not become members of the police department so as to exercise the police power. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-28.

Creation of marshal's office did not establish police force. - County marshal's office is not equivalent to a county police force and, therefore, when a county did not establish a police force when the county created a marshal's office, the governing authority must comply with the requirements of subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-8-1 before creating a county police force. 1995 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U95-14.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police and Constables, § 13.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 164 et seq.

ALR. - Validity, construction, and application of enactments relating to requirement of residency within or near specified governmental unit as condition of continued employment for policemen or firemen, 4 A.L.R.4th 380.

36-8-2. Terms of office; removal; authority to abolish county police force.

Statute text

The terms for which county police shall be elected or appointed shall be left to the discretion of the county governing authority. Such county police or any member thereof may be removed from office at any time, at the will of the county governing authority, with or without cause. A resolution or ordinance authorizing the creation of a county police force adopted by a county governing authority and approved by the qualified electors of the county in a special election as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-8-1 shall not affect the power of the county governing authority to abolish a county police force at any time.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 7; Civil Code 1910, § 855; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 7; Code 1933, § 23-1407; Ga. L. 1992, p. 324, § 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Validity of special law. - Even though a general law provides the manner for discharging county police by the county commissioners, a special law relating to this subject in a county is valid. Deason v. DeKalb County, 222 Ga. 63, 148 S.E.2d 414 (1966).

Cited in Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948); Wolfe v. Huff, 232 Ga. 44, 205 S.E.2d 254 (1974).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Qualifications of sheriff as police officer. - When a county police department is established and the law enforcement functions of the sheriff are transferred to such department, the sheriff or the sheriff's deputies may not become members of the police department so as to exercise the police power. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-28.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, § 17 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 161 et seq.

ALR. - Sexual misconduct or irregularity as amounting to "conduct unbecoming an officer," justifying officer's demotion, removal or suspension from duty, 9 A.L.R.4th 614.

36-8-3. Bonds and actions thereon.

Statute text

Upon the election of county police, each of them shall enter into a good and solvent bond, in a sum of not less than $1,000.00, to be fixed by the county governing authority, conditioned for the faithful performance of all their duties. Anyone injured or damaged by any one of such county police may bring an action upon his bond in his name or in the name of the county governing authority for his benefit or use.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 854; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 6; Code 1933, § 23-1406.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article on bond liability and righting the wrongs of Georgia local government officers, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

No change in general law. - Nothing in this chapter (especially Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 6 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-8-3)), which authorizes the appointment of county police officers, insofar as the statute may undertake to fix the liability of the sureties upon a county officer's bond, changes the general law as contained in former Civil Code 1910, § 291 (see now O.C.G.A. § 45-4-24). Hodge v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 42 Ga. App. 84, 155 S.E. 95 (1930).

Bond refers only to official duties. - Bond required of a county police officer, wherein it is conditioned for the faithful performance by the officer of the officer's duties, has reference only to those duties which are incident to the office of county police officer, and not to those general duties incumbent upon every person as a member of society. Hodge v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 42 Ga. App. 84, 155 S.E. 95 (1930).

Cited in Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, § 15.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 160.

ALR. - Right of individual to maintain action on bond of peace officer, 19 A.L.R. 73.

Liability on bond of sheriff or other peace officer for unlawful search, 62 A.L.R. 855.

36-8-4. Establishment of salaries; payment; tax levy.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall fix the salaries of the county police, which salaries, together with the expense of maintaining the police, shall be paid out of the county treasury. The county governing authority is authorized to levy such tax as may be necessary to pay such salaries and expenses over and above the sums for which it is otherwise authorized to levy a tax.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 850; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 2; Code 1933, § 23-1402.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Authority of counties to exercise power of taxation, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. IV, Paras. I-III.
